Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB311.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2928YC (1) 91 jda/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 298.4, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraphs: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . h. To pay the costs of operating and 3 licensing school safety and security infrastructure, including 4 weapons detection systems and door monitoring systems. 5 NEW PARAGRAPH . i. To pay the costs of employing, or 6 retaining the services of, any of the following: 7 (1) A school resource officer as defined in 34 U.S.C. 8 Â§10389. 9 (2) An individual employed by a private security business, 10 as defined in section 80A.1, who possesses a permit to carry 11 weapons issued under section 724.6. 12 (3) A reserve peace officer as defined in section 80D.1A. 13 (4) A peace officer as defined in section 801.4. 14 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to school budget 15 years beginning on or after July 1, 2025. 16